Connecticut, session 2026, SB00430.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"integrated setting" means a setting that enables persons with
disabilities to interact with nondisabled persons as described in
subsection (d) of 28 CFR 35.130, and (2) "public entity" means a state
agency as defined in section 1-79 of the general statutes or a local
government or department, agency, special purpose district or other
instrumentality of a local government located within the state.
(b) A public entity shall administer services, programs and activities
in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of persons with
disabilities who meet any applicable eligibility requirements for receipt
of such services, programs or activities. Any person aggrieved by an
alleged violation of this section may file a discriminatory practice
complaint with the Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities
in accordance with the provisions of section 46a-82 of the general
statutes.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (8) of section 46a-51 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu

Senate Bill No. 430
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(8) "Discriminatory practice" means a violation of section 4a-60, 4a-
60g, 19a-498c, 31-40y, subsection (b), (d), (e) or (f) of section 31-51i,
subparagraph (C) of subdivision (15) of section 46a-54, subdivisions (16)
and (17) of section 46a-54, section 46a-58, 46a-59, 46a-59a, 46a-60, 46a-
64, 46a-64c, 46a-66 or 46a-68, sections 46a-68c to 46a-68f, inclusive,
sections 46a-70 to 46a-78, inclusive, subsection (a) of section 46a-80,
sections 46a-81b to 46a-81o, inclusive, sections 46a-80b to 46a-80e,
inclusive, [or] sections 46a-80k to 46a-80m, inclusive, [or] section 49-41c
or section 1 of this act;
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-150 2 of 2